New York, session 2025-2026, A5050.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 49 of section 1 of chapter 174 of the laws of 1968, 2 constituting the New York state urban development corporation act, is 3 amended by adding a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 4 4. Any grant issued by the dormitory authority or the corporation from 5 the state and municipal facilities program shall be sponsored by the 6 governor or have a sponsor from the state senate or the state assembly. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 8 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01690-01-5